Vermont, session 2025-2026, H207.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4089c is amended to read:
§ 4089c. DIABETES TREATMENT
(a)(1) A health insurer shall provide coverage for the equipment, supplies,
and outpatient self-management training and education, including medical
nutrition therapy, for the treatment of insulin dependent diabetes, insulin using
diabetes, gestational diabetes, and noninsulin using diabetes if prescribed by a
health care professional legally authorized to prescribe such items under law.
VT LEG #380803 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.207
2025 Page 2 of 2
A health insurer may require that such prescriptions be made, and care be
given, by a health care professional under contract with the insurer.
(2) Diabetes outpatient self-management training and education required
to be covered by this section shall be provided by a certified, registered, or
licensed health care professional with specialized training in the education and
management of diabetes.
(3) Benefits required to be covered by this section shall not be subject to
the same any dollar limits, deductibles, and coinsurance factors within the
provisions of the health insurance policy or to any co-payment, coinsurance,
deductible, or other cost-sharing requirement.
(b) For the purposes of this section, “insurer” means any health insurance
company, nonprofit hospital and medical service corporation, and health
maintenance organization. The term does not apply to coverage for specified
disease or other limited benefit coverage.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026 and shall apply to all health
insurance plans issued on and after January 1, 2026 on such date as a health
insurer offers, issues, or renews the health insurance plan, but in no event later
than January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #380803 v.1